Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 10
WITHDRAWALS AND DISQUALIFICATIONS
FROM, AND VACANCIES IN,
NOMINATIONS AND DESIGNATIONS

Editor's note:

Articles 1 to 13 were repealed and reenacted in 1980. This part 10 was repealed and reenacted in 1992 and was subsequently amended with relocations in 2017, resulting in the addition, relocation, or elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this part 10 prior to 2017, consult the 2016 Colorado Revised Statutes and the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume. Former C.R.S. section numbers prior to 2017 are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated. For a detailed comparison of articles 1 to 13 for 1980 and of this part 10 for 1992, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

1-4-1001. Withdrawal or disqualification from candidacy.

Any person who has accepted a designation or nomination may withdraw from candidacy at any time by filing a letter of withdrawal. The withdrawing candidate shall sign and acknowledge the letter before an officer authorized to take acknowledgments and shall file the letter with the designated election official with whom the original certificate or petition of candidacy was filed.

Any candidate withdrawing from a designation or nomination shall forthwith report the withdrawal to the persons designated in this part 10 to fill the vacancy.

Except in the case of a vacancy to be filled in accordance with the provisions of section 1-4-1004 or 1-4-1006 that apply when a vacancy occurs from the earliest day to mail ballots pursuant to section 1-7.5-107 and the day of a primary or general election, respectively, if the withdrawal of candidacy is not made in time for the candidate's name to be taken off the ballot, any votes cast for the candidate are invalid and shall not be counted.

If the designated election official disqualifies a candidate before the ballots are printed, that candidate's name shall not appear on the ballots.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire part amended with relocated provisions, (SB 17-209), ch. 234, p. 947, § 5, effective August 9.

1-4-1002. Vacancies in major party designation up to the sixty-eighth day before primary election day.

For the purposes of this section, a vacancy is caused by:

The declination, death, disqualification, or withdrawal of the person designated by a party assembly as a candidate for nomination; or

The failure of a party assembly to make designation of any candidate for nomination.

Repealed.

Any vacancy in a party designation occurring after the party assembly at which the designation was made and no later than sixty-eight days before the primary election may be filled by the party assembly vacancy committee of the district, county, or state, depending upon the office for which the vacancy in designation has occurred. The party assembly vacancy committee must be appointed by the party in accordance with party rules.

No vacancy committee called to fill a vacancy pursuant to this section may select a person to fill the vacancy at a meeting held for that purpose unless a written notice announcing the time and location of the vacancy committee meeting was mailed to each of the committee members within five calendar days of the chairperson of the central committee receiving notice of the vacancy. Mailing of the notice is effective when the notice is properly addressed and deposited in the United States mail, with first-class postage prepaid. In addition to this mailing, the chairperson of the central committee may also contact the committee members by electronic mail.

No vacancy committee meeting shall be held until a quorum is present consisting of not less than one-half of the voting membership of the vacancy committee.

The vacancy committee, by a majority vote of its members present and voting at a meeting called for that purpose, shall select a person who meets all of the requirements of candidacy as of the date of the appointment and who is affiliated with the same political party:

As shown in the statewide voter registration system as the candidate whose declination, death, disqualification, or withdrawal caused the vacancy; or

As the party assembly that failed to designate a candidate, as applicable.

No member of the vacancy committee may vote by proxy.

If the vacancy committee fails to timely certify a selection, the state chair of the party of the candidate whose declination, death, disqualification, or withdrawal caused the vacancy, within seven days, shall fill the vacancy by appointing a person who meets all of the requirements of candidacy as of the date of the appointment and who is affiliated with the same political party shown in the statewide voter registration system as the candidate whose declination, death, disqualification, or withdrawal caused the vacancy. The name of the person appointed by the state chair must be certified to the secretary of state.

The designation and acceptance of the person selected to fill the vacancy must be submitted to the designated election official no later than three days from either the date of the vacancy committee meeting or from the date of appointment by the state chair pursuant to subsection (3)(b)(IV) of this section, as applicable; except that such certification must in all cases be submitted no later than the sixty-fourth day before the date of the primary election.

For purposes of this section, a vacancy is filled when the designated election official receives the certificate of nomination and the written acceptance of the replacement candidate.

If a person designated to fill a vacancy pursuant to this section decides not to fill a vacancy, he or she shall in like manner file a certificate setting forth the occurrence of the vacancy, stating that he or she does not intend to fill the vacancy.

When a vacancy occurs and is filled pursuant to this section, the designated election official shall certify the name of the replacement candidate to the ballot.

Notwithstanding any provisions to the contrary, if a political party has established a rule regarding the length of affiliation required for a candidate, and a vacancy in that office occurs, then the party rule applies.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire part amended with relocated provisions, (SB 17-209), ch. 234, p. 948, § 5, effective August 9.

L. 2020:

(1) amended and (6) added, (HB 20-1359), ch. 23, p. 86, § 7, effective March 16.

1-4-1003. Vacancies in major party designation occurring between the sixty-seventh day before a primary election and the earliest day to mail primary election ballots.

For the purposes of this section, a vacancy is caused by the declination, death, disqualification, or withdrawal of the person designated by the assembly as a candidate for nomination.

Repealed.

A vacancy in a party nomination occurring between the sixty-seventh day before a primary election and the earliest day to mail primary election ballots pursuant to section 1-7.5-107 may be filled by the respective party assembly vacancy committee of the appropriate district, county, or state. The party assembly vacancy committee must be appointed by the party in accordance with party rules.

No vacancy committee called to fill a vacancy pursuant to this section may select a person to fill a vacancy at a meeting held for that purpose unless a written notice announcing the time and location of the vacancy committee meeting was mailed to each of the committee members within five calendar days of the chairperson of the central committee learning of the vacancy. Mailing of the notice is effective when the notice is properly addressed and deposited in the United States mail, with first-class postage prepaid. In addition to this mailing, the chairperson of the central committee may also contact the committee members by electronic mail.

No vacancy committee meeting shall be held until a quorum is present consisting of not less than one-half of the voting membership of the vacancy committee.

The vacancy committee, by a majority vote of its members present and voting at a meeting called for that purpose, shall select a person who meets all of the requirements of candidacy as of the date of the primary election and who is affiliated with the same political party or minor political party, if any, shown in the statewide voter registration database as the candidate whose declination, death, disqualification, or withdrawal caused the vacancy.

No member of the vacancy committee may vote by proxy.

If the vacancy committee fails to timely certify a selection, the state chair of the party of the candidate whose declination, death, disqualification, or withdrawal caused the vacancy, within seven days, shall fill the vacancy by appointing a person who meets all of the requirements of candidacy as of the date of the appointment and who is affiliated with the same political party shown in the statewide voter registration system as the candidate whose declination, death, disqualification, or withdrawal caused the vacancy. The name of the person appointed by the state chair must be certified to the secretary of state.

The designation and acceptance of the person selected to fill the vacancy must be submitted to the designated election official no later than three days from either the date of the vacancy committee meeting or from the date of appointment by the state chair pursuant to subsection (3)(b)(IV) of this section, as applicable.

For purposes of this section, a vacancy is filled when the designated election official receives the certificate of nomination and the written acceptance of the replacement candidate.

No person is eligible for appointment to fill a vacancy in a party designation unless that person meets all requirements of candidacy as of the date that the vacancy appointment is made.

If a person designated to fill a vacancy pursuant to this section decides not to fill a vacancy, he or she shall in like manner file a certificate setting forth the occurrence of the vacancy, stating that he or she does not intend to fill the vacancy.

When a vacancy in a party designation is filled pursuant to this section prior to the ballots being printed, the designated election official shall cause the name of the replacement candidate to be printed on the ballot.

When a vacancy in a party designation is filled pursuant to this section after the ballots are printed:

The designated election official shall:

Prominently post, on the designated election official's official website and in each voter service and polling center, a notice regarding the vacancy and the name of the replacement candidate; and

Either cause to be printed and placed on the sample ballot delivered to the election judges and posted pursuant to section 1-5-413 a sticker of a different color than the sample ballot indicating the name of the replacement candidate or reprint the sample ballot with the name of the replacement candidate in a different color; and

Votes cast for the candidate who vacated the designation must be counted as votes for the replacement candidate.

Notwithstanding any provisions to the contrary, if a political party has established a rule regarding the length of affiliation required for a candidate, and a vacancy in that office occurs, then the party rule applies.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire part amended with relocated provisions, (SB 17-209), ch. 234, p. 954, § 5, effective August 9.

L. 2020:

(1) amended, (HB 20-1359), ch. 23, p. 87, § 8, effective March 16.

Editor's note:

Subsection (1)(b)(II) provided for the repeal of subsection (1)(b), effective December 31, 2020. (See L. 2020, p. 87.)

1-4-1004. Vacancies in major party designation occurring from the day after the earliest day to mail primary election ballots through primary election day.

For the purposes of this section, a vacancy is caused by the declination, death, disqualification, or withdrawal of the person designated by the assembly as a candidate for nomination.

A vacancy in a party designation occurring from the day after the earliest day to mail primary election ballots pursuant to section 1-7.5-107 through the day of the primary election may be filled by the respective party assembly vacancy committee of the district, county, or state, depending upon the office for which the vacancy in nomination has occurred. The party assembly vacancy committee must be appointed by the party in accordance with party rules.

No vacancy committee called to fill a vacancy pursuant to this section may select a person to fill a vacancy at a meeting held for that purpose unless a written notice announcing the time and location of the vacancy committee meeting was mailed to each of the committee members within five calendar days of the chairperson of the central committee learning of the vacancy. Mailing of the notice is effective when the notice is properly addressed and deposited in the United States mail, with first-class postage prepaid. In addition to the mailing, the chairperson of the central committee may also contact committee members by electronic mail.

No vacancy committee meeting shall be held until a quorum is present consisting of not less than one-half of the voting membership of the vacancy committee.

The vacancy committee, by a majority vote of its members present and voting at a meeting called for that purpose, shall select a person who meets all of the requirements of candidacy as of the date of the primary election and who is affiliated with the same political party or minor political party, if any, shown in the statewide voter registration database as the candidate whose declination, death, disqualification, or withdrawal caused the vacancy.

No member of the vacancy committee may vote by proxy.

If the vacancy committee fails to timely certify a selection, the state chair of the party of the candidate whose declination, death, disqualification, or withdrawal caused the vacancy, within seven days, shall fill the vacancy by appointing a person who meets all of the requirements of candidacy as of the date of the appointment and who is affiliated with the same political party shown in the statewide voter registration system as the candidate whose declination, death, disqualification, or withdrawal caused the vacancy. The name of the person appointed by the state chair must be certified to the secretary of state.

The designation and acceptance of the person selected to fill the vacancy must be submitted to the designated election official no later than three days from either the date of the vacancy committee meeting or from the date of appointment by the state chair pursuant to subsection (3)(b)(IV) of this section, as applicable.

For purposes of this section, a vacancy is filled when the designated election official receives the certificate of nomination and the written acceptance of the replacement candidate.

No person is eligible for appointment to fill a vacancy in a party designation unless that person meets all requirements of candidacy as of the date that the vacancy appointment is made.

If a person designated to fill a vacancy pursuant to this section decides not to fill a vacancy, he or she shall in like manner file a certificate setting forth the occurrence of the vacancy, stating they do not intend to fill the vacancy.

When a vacancy in a party nomination is filled pursuant to this section:

The designated election official shall:

Prominently post, on the designated election official's official website and in each voter service and polling center, a notice regarding the vacancy and the name of the replacement candidate; and

Either cause to be printed and placed on the sample ballot delivered to the election judges and posted pursuant to section 1-5-413 a sticker of a different color than the sample ballot indicating the name of the replacement candidate or reprint the sample ballot with the name of the replacement candidate in a different color; and

Votes cast for the candidate who vacated the designation must be counted as votes for the replacement candidate.

Notwithstanding any provisions to the contrary, if a political party has established a rule regarding the length of affiliation required for a candidate, and a vacancy in that office occurs, then the party rule applies.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire part amended with relocated provisions, (SB 17-209), ch. 234, p. 956, § 5, effective August 9.

1-4-1005. Vacancies in major party nomination occurring from the day after primary election day through the earliest day to mail general election ballots.

For the purposes of this section, a vacancy is caused by the declination, death, disqualification, or withdrawal of the person nominated at the primary election.

A vacancy in a party nomination occurring from the day after the primary election through the earliest day to mail general election ballots may be filled by the respective party assembly vacancy committee of the district, county, or state, depending upon the office for which the vacancy in nomination has occurred. The party assembly vacancy committee must be appointed by the party in accordance with party rules.

No vacancy committee called to fill a vacancy pursuant to this section may select a person to fill a vacancy at a meeting held for that purpose unless a written notice announcing the time and location of the vacancy committee meeting was mailed to each of the committee members within five calendar days of the chairperson of the central committee learning of the vacancy. Mailing of the notice is effective when the notice is properly addressed and deposited in the United States mail, with first-class postage prepaid. In addition to the mailing, the chairperson of the central committee may also contact committee members by electronic mail.

No vacancy committee meeting shall be held until a quorum is present consisting of not less than one-half of the voting membership of the vacancy committee.

The vacancy committee, by a majority vote of its members present and voting at a meeting called for that purpose, shall select a person who meets all of the requirements of candidacy as of the date of the primary election and who is affiliated with the same political party or minor political party, if any, shown in the statewide voter registration database as the candidate whose declination, death, disqualification, or withdrawal caused the vacancy.

No member of the vacancy committee may vote by proxy.

If the vacancy committee fails to timely certify a selection, the state chair of the party of the candidate whose declination, death, disqualification, or withdrawal caused the vacancy, within seven days, shall fill the vacancy by appointing a person who meets all of the requirements of candidacy as of the date of the appointment and who is affiliated with the same political party shown in the statewide voter registration system as the candidate whose declination, death, disqualification, or withdrawal caused the vacancy. The name of the person appointed by the state chair must be certified to the secretary of state. The vacancy is filled until the next general election after the vacancy occurs, when the vacancy is filled by election.

The designation and acceptance of the person selected to fill the vacancy must be submitted to the designated election official no later than three days from either the date of the vacancy committee meeting or from the date of appointment by the state chair pursuant to subsection (3)(b)(IV) of this section, as applicable; except that such certification must in all cases be submitted no later than the sixty-fourth day before the date of the general election.

For purposes of this section, a vacancy is filled when the designated election official receives the certificate of nomination and the written acceptance of the replacement candidate.

No person is eligible for appointment to fill a vacancy in a party designation unless that person meets all requirements of candidacy as of the date that the vacancy appointment is made.

If a person designated to fill a vacancy pursuant to this section decides not to fill a vacancy, he or she shall in like manner file a certificate setting forth the occurrence of the vacancy, stating they do not intend to fill the vacancy.

When a vacancy in a party nomination is filled pursuant to this section prior to the ballots being printed, the designated election official shall cause the name of the replacement candidate to be printed on the ballot.

When a vacancy in a party nomination is filled pursuant to this section subsequent to the ballots being printed:

The designated election official shall:

Prominently post, on the designated election official's official website and in each voter service and polling center, a notice regarding the vacancy and the name of the replacement candidate; and

Either cause to be printed and placed on the sample ballot delivered to the election judges and posted pursuant to section 1-5-413 a sticker of a different color than the sample ballot indicating the name of the replacement candidate or reprint the sample ballot with the name of the replacement candidate in a different color; and

Votes cast for the candidate who vacated the nomination must be counted as votes for the replacement candidate.

Notwithstanding any provisions to the contrary, if a political party has established a rule regarding the length of affiliation required for a candidate and a vacancy in that office occurs, then the party rule applies.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire part amended with relocated provisions, (SB 17-209), ch. 234, p. 957, § 5, effective August 9.

L. 2019:

(3)(c)(I) amended, (HB 19-1278), ch. 326, p. 3019, § 25, effective August 2.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Colorado Votes Act") in HB 19-1278, see section 1 of chapter 326, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

1-4-1006. Vacancies in major party nomination occurring from the day after the earliest day to mail general election ballots through general election day.

For the purposes of this section, a vacancy is caused by the declination, death, disqualification, or withdrawal of the person nominated at the primary election.

A vacancy occurring from the day after the earliest day to mail general election ballots through general election day must be filled in accordance with part 2 of article 12 of this code.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire part amended with relocated provisions, (SB 17-209), ch. 234, p. 959, § 5, effective August 9.

1-4-1007. Vacancies in minor party designation or nomination.

Any vacancy in a nomination for a minor political party candidate occurring after the filing of the certificate of designation pursuant to section 1-4-1304 (3) and no later than seventy days before the general or congressional vacancy election, which is caused by the declination, death, disqualification, or withdrawal of any person nominated by the minor political party, may be filled by the person or persons designated in the constitution or bylaws of the minor political party to fill vacancies.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire part amended with relocated provisions, (SB 17-209), ch. 234, p. 960, § 5, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-4-1002 (4.5) as it existed prior to 2017.

1-4-1008. Vacancies in unaffiliated designation or nomination.

Any vacancy in a nomination for an unaffiliated candidate caused by the declination, death, disqualification, or withdrawal of any person nominated by petition or statement of intent occurring after the filing of the petition for nomination and no later than seventy days before the general or congressional vacancy election may be filled by the person or persons designated on the petition or statement of intent to fill vacancies.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire part amended with relocated provisions, (SB 17-209), ch. 234, p. 960, § 5, effective August 9.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (SB 22-212), ch. 421, p. 2963, § 2, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-4-1002 (4) as it existed prior to 2017.

1-4-1009. Vacancies in school district director nomination.

A vacancy in nomination for a school district director candidate caused by the declination, death, disqualification, or withdrawal of any person nominated by petition occurring after the filing of the petition for nomination may be filled by the person or persons designated or appointed on the petition within five days of the person or persons learning of the vacancy.

When a vacancy is filled in accordance with this section before the ballots are printed, the coordinated election official shall cause the name of the replacement candidate to be printed on the ballot.

When a vacancy is filled in accordance with this section after the ballots are printed:

The coordinated election official shall:

Prominently post, on the coordinated election official's official website and in each voter service and polling center, a notice regarding the vacancy and the name of the replacement candidate; and

Either cause to be printed and placed on the sample ballot delivered to the election judges and posted in accordance with section 1-5-413 a sticker of a different color than the sample ballot indicating the name of the replacement candidate or reprint the sample ballot with the name of the replacement candidate in a different color; and

Votes cast for the candidate who vacated the nomination must be counted as votes for the replacement candidate.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire part amended with relocated provisions, (SB 17-209), ch. 234, p. 960, § 5, effective August 9.

1-4-1010. Vacancies in office occurring from the sixty-eighth day prior to primary election day through the earliest day to mail general election ballots.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section or section 1-4-1010 (2), any vacancy in a statewide or county office, in the office of district attorney, or in the office of a state senator occurring during a term of office and falling within the time periods governed by section 1-4-1002, 1-4-1003, 1-4-1004, or 1-4-1005 shall be filled at the next general election with nomination or designation by the political party as follows:

If the vacancy occurs before the political party assembly, the designated election official shall notify the chairperson of each major political party that the office will be on the ballot for the next primary election, and candidates for the office shall be designated as provided in section 1-4-601 or 1-4-603.

No person is eligible for appointment to fill a vacancy in a party designation unless that person meets all requirements of candidacy as of the date that the vacancy appointment is made.

If the vacancy occurs after the political party assembly and no later than sixty-eight days before the primary election, the designated election official shall add the office to the notice of election and notify the chairperson of each major political party that the office will be on the ballot for the next primary election. Candidates for the office shall be designated as provided in section 1-4-603 or by the respective party central committee vacancy committee for the state, county, judicial district, or state senate district.

No person is eligible for appointment to fill a vacancy in a party designation unless that person meets all requirements of candidacy as of the date that the vacancy appointment is made.

If the vacancy occurs during the sixty-seven days before the primary election, or after the primary election and no later than sixty-eight days before the general election, the designated election official shall add the office to the notice of election for the general election and notify the chairperson of each major political party that the office will be on the ballot for the next general election. Nominations for the office shall be made by the respective party central committee vacancy committee for the state, county, judicial district, or state senate district or as provided in section 1-4-802 for the nomination of unaffiliated candidates.

If the vacancy occurs sixty-eight days or fewer before a general election, that office must be filled at the next general election.

Any vacancy in a statewide or county office, in the office of district attorney, or in the office of a state senator occurring during a term of office shall be filled at the next general election with nomination or designation by a minor political party pursuant to the constitution or bylaws of the minor political party.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire part amended with relocated provisions, (SB 17-209), ch. 234, p. 960, § 5, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

Subection (1) is similar to former § 1-4-1002 (7) as it existed prior to 2017. Subsection (2) is similar to former § 1-4-1002 (7.5) as it existed prior to 2017.

1-4-1011. Vacancies of joint gubernatorial candidates - process for filling vacancy in nomination for office of lieutenant governor.

For the purposes of this part 10, no vacancy in designation or nomination for the office of governor or the office of lieutenant governor in any way affects the candidacy of the other joint candidate.

Any vacancy in a nomination for the office of lieutenant governor must be filled by appointment by the vacating candidate's joint candidate for governor.

For the purposes of this section, a vacancy is caused by the declination, death, disqualification, or withdrawal of the candidate designated or nominated for governor or lieutenant governor.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire part amended with relocated provisions, (SB 17-209), ch. 234, p. 961, § 5, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

Subsection (1) is similar to former § 1-4-1003 as it existed prior to 2017. Subsection (2) is similar to former § 1-4-1002 (7.3) as it existed prior to 2017.

1-4-1012. Remote participation in vacancy committee meetings.

Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, a member of a vacancy committee filling a vacancy pursuant to this part 10 may participate in a vacancy committee meeting remotely, including casting the member's vote by e-mail, mail, telephone, or through an internet-based application if allowed by the party's rules.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (HB 21-1001), ch. 1, p. 2, § 2, effective January 20; (2) repealed, (SB 21-250), ch. 282, p. 1643, § 24, effective June 21.